Washington statutes.
RCW 19.260.050

Limit on sale or installation of products required to meet or exceed standards in RCW 19.260.040.

(1) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, may not be sold or offered in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:

(a) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;

(b) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;

(c) Portable electric spas;

(d) Tub spout diverters; and

(e) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.

(2) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1, 2010, may not be installed for compensation in the state on or after January 1, 2011, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:

(a) Hot water dispensers and mini-tank electric water heaters;

(b) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers;

(c) Portable electric spas;

(d) Tub spout diverters; and

(e) Commercial hot food holding cabinets.

(3) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1, 2021, may not be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:

(a) Commercial dishwashers;

(b) Commercial fryers;

(c) Commercial steam cookers;

(d) Computers or computer monitors;

(e) Faucets;

(f) Residential ventilating fans that meet the standard specified in RCW 19.260.040(13)(a);

(g) Spray sprinkler bodies;

(h) Showerheads;

(i) Urinals and water closets; and

(j) Water coolers.

(4) The following products, if manufactured on or after January 1, 2024, may not be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040:

(a) Air purifiers other than industrial air purifiers;

(b) Commercial ovens;

(c) Electric vehicle supply equipment; and

(d) Residential ventilating fans that meet the standard specified in RCW 19.260.040(13)(b).

(5) Standards for the following products expire January 1, 2020:

(a) Hot water dispensers; and

(b) Bottle-type water dispensers and point-of-use water dispensers.

(6) A new air compressor manufactured on or after January 1, 2022, may not be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.

(7) A new portable air conditioner manufactured on or after February 1, 2022, may not be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.

(8) New general service lamps manufactured on or after January 1, 2020, may not be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040.

(9) No new high CRI fluorescent lamps may be sold or offered for sale in the state after January 1, 2023, unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in RCW 19.260.040. The department may establish by rule an earlier effective date, not before January 1, 2022, if the state of California adopts a comparable standard with an effective date before January 1, 2023.

(10) The department may by rule establish a later effective date or suspend enforcement of any of the requirements of this chapter if the department determines that such a delay or suspension is in the public interest.

[ 2022 c 19 s 5; 2019 c 286 s 6; 2009 c 501 s 4; 2006 c 194 s 4; 2005 c 298 s 5.]